Ohio, session 136, HB432.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5534.482 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5534.482. In addition to any other name prescribed in the Revised Code or otherwise, that portion of east Kemper road, between tri county parkway and Lebanon road, in Hamilton county, shall be known as the "Patrolman Earl W. Casterline Memorial Highway." The director of transportation may erect suitable markers along the highway indicating its name.